Virginia statutes. Title 28.2. Fisheries and Habitat of the Tidal Waters
Article 1. General Provisions

§ 28.2-800.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Crustacea”
means all edible species of crab, lobster and shrimp, whether raw or processed.

“Depuration”
means the process that uses a controlled aquatic environment to reduce the level of bacteria or viruses in live shellfish.

“Establishment”
means any vehicle, vessel, property or premises where crustacea, finfish or shellfish are transported, held, stored, processed, packed, repacked, or pasteurized in preparation for marketing.

“Finfish”
means any cold-blooded, strictly aquatic, water-breathing craniate vertebrate with fins, including cyclostomes, elasmobranchs and higher-gilled aquatic vertebrates with cartilaginous or bony skeletons or any parts thereof.

“Relay”
means to move shellfish for the purpose of natural purification from water which is not approved to water which is approved or conditionally approved by the State Health Commissioner.

“Shellfish”
means all species within the phylum Mollusca including but not limited to oysters, clams, mussels, scallops, conchs and whelks, whether raw or processed.

History.

1979, c. 714, § 28.1-175.1; 1992, c. 836.

§ 28.2-801.
Authority to promulgate regulations; enforcement.

The State Health Commissioner and the Commissioner of Marine Resources shall enforce the provisions of this chapter and regulations promulgated thereunder.

The State Board of Health and the Marine Resources Commission may promulgate regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

The Marine Resources Commission, whenever it determines that an emergency exists, may promulgate regulations which relate to shellfish in condemned areas, in order to protect the health of the public, without complying with the requirements of §§

28.2-209

and

28.2-210

. Such regulations shall become effective upon their passage by the Marine Resources Commission. These regulations shall be enforced by revoking any permits which may have been issued.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 28-162.1, 28-168; 1960, c. 517; 1962, c. 406, §§ 28.1-179, 28.1-180; 1966, c. 684; 1968, c. 745; 1979, c. 274; 1981, c. 52; 1986, c. 184; 1988, c. 600; 1992, c. 836.

§ 28.2-802.
Powers of officers charged with enforcement; entry to establishment; seizure; destruction.

For the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter, the State Health Commissioner and the Commissioner of Marine Resources or their designees may enter any establishment located in the Commonwealth, where crustacea or shellfish may be found, and if it appears that any provision of this chapter has been violated, may, with or without a warrant, arrest any person who is or has been, or is believed to be or have been, in charge of the crustacea or shellfish and may seize, in the name of the Commonwealth, and take possession of such crustacea or shellfish.

The State Health Commissioner and the Commissioner of Marine Resources, or their designees, may seize and take possession of any boat, vessel, barge, car, motor vehicle or other conveyance used in violation of any provision of this chapter. Such boat, vessel, barge, car, motor vehicle or other conveyance may be held only until the accused has been admitted to bail as provided by Chapter 9 (§

19.2-119

et seq.) of Title 19.2 or has been served with and released on summons.

When any crustacea or shellfish of an accused are seized pursuant to the provisions of this section, they may be destroyed at the discretion of the State Health Commissioner, the Commissioner of Marine Resources or their designees. If the accused is acquitted of the charges, he shall be compensated for their value, based on the average selling price on the day of seizure.

History.

Code 1950, § 28-166; 1962, c. 406, § 28.1-183; 1966, c. 684; 1989, c. 2; 1992, c. 836.